Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
H. Religious Corporations

§ 17-19-180.
Constitutional protections.

If religious doctrine governing the affairs of a religious corporation is inconsistent with the provisions of this act on the same subject, the religious doctrine shall control to the extent required by the constitution of the United States or the constitution of this state or both.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).